Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 13.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
1-125.02
Foreign accountant; temporary practice
privilege; conditions; limitations; fee.

(1) The board may, in its discretion, grant a person who
holds a certificate, degree, or license in a foreign country constituting
a recognized qualification for the practice of public accountancy in such
country, and who does not hold a certificate or permit issued by this state
or any other state and whose principal place of business is outside this state,
the privilege to temporarily practice in this state on professional business
incident to his or her regular practice outside this state, if such privilege
to temporarily practice is conducted in conformity with the rules and regulations
of the board.

(2) Any person
of another country exercising the temporary practice privilege granted under
this section and any partnership, limited liability company, or other allowed
entity of certified public accountants which employ that person hereby simultaneously
consent, as a condition of the grant of the temporary practice privilege:

(a) To the personal
and subject-matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board;

(b) To comply
with the Public Accountancy Act and the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated under the act;

(c) That in the event the authorization to engage
in the practice of public accountancy in the country of the person's principal
place of business is no longer valid, the person will cease offering or rendering
professional services in this state individually and on behalf of the person's
partnership, limited liability company, or other allowed entity of certified
public accountants; and

(d) To the appointment of the board as his or her
agent upon whom process may be served in any action or proceeding by the board
against the person.

(3) The temporary practice privilege afforded under
this section or any other section shall not be interpreted to prevent any
governmental body from requiring that public accounting services performed
for a governmental body or for an entity regulated by a governmental body
be performed by a person or firm who holds a permit issued under section 1-136.

(4) Any person
who has been granted the temporary practice privilege afforded under this
section and who, for any entity with its home office in this state, performs
attestation services, may only do so through a firm or affiliated entity which
holds a permit issued under section 1-136.

(5) Any person who has been granted the temporary
practice privilege afforded under this section shall use only the title or
designation under which he or she is generally known in his or her own country,
followed by the name of his or her foreign country.

(6) The board shall charge
each person who has been granted the temporary practice privilege afforded
under this section a fee as established by the board not to exceed fifty dollars.

Laws 2009, LB31, § 13.